bulgarian.aff
flag *V:
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À¿
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À»
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À»ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À»ﬂ“
    ¿        >      -¿,¿ÀŒ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿ÀŒ“Œ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿“
    ¿        >      -¿,¿’
    ¿        >      -¿,¿’¿
    ¿        >      -¿,¿’Ã≈
    ¿        >      -¿,¿’“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,¿Ÿ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿Ÿ¿
    ¿        >      -¿,¿Ÿ¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,¿Ÿ»
    ¿        >      -¿,¿Ÿ»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,¿Ÿ»ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿Ÿ»ﬂ“
    ¿        >      -¿,¿ŸŒ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿ŸŒ“Œ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈… »
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À¿
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»ﬂ“
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ÀŒ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ÀŒ“Œ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈’
    ¿        >      -¿,≈’¿
    ¿        >      -¿,≈’Ã≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈’“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ÿ≈
    ¿        >      -¿,»
    ¿        >      -¿,»Ã
    ¿        >      -¿,»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,»ÿ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈… »
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÕŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÕŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÿ≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»ÀŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»ÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»Ã
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»’
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»’¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»’Ã≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»’“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»ÿ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,…
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,…“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ’
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ’¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ’Ã≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ’“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸŒ“Œ

flag *W:
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈… »
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈À
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈À¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈À¿“¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈À»
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈À»“≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈À»ﬂ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈À»ﬂ“
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈ÀŒ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈ÀŒ“Œ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈Ã
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈“≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈’
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈’¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈’Ã≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈’“≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈ÿ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈ÿ≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈Ÿ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈Ÿ¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈Ÿ¿“¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈Ÿ»
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈Ÿ»“≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈Ÿ»ﬂ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈Ÿ»ﬂ“
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈ŸŒ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈ŸŒ“Œ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈…
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈…“≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈À»
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈À»“≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈À»ﬂ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈À»ﬂ“
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈“»
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈“»“≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈ﬂ“
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÀ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÀ¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÀ¿“¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÀŒ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÀŒ“Œ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ“
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ“¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ“¿“¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ“»ﬂ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ“»ﬂ“
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ“Œ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ“Œ“Œ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ’
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ’¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ’Ã≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ’“≈
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆¿“
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈À
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈À¿
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈À¿“¿
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈À»
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈À»“≈
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈À»ﬂ
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈À»ﬂ“
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈ÀŒ
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈ÀŒ“Œ
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈Ã
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈“≈
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈’
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈’¿
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈’Ã≈
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈’“≈
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈ÿ
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆≈ÿ≈
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,∆»
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿À
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿À¿
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿À¿“¿
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿À»
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿À»“≈
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿À»ﬂ
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿À»ﬂ“
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿ÀŒ
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿ÀŒ“Œ
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿Õ
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿Õ¿
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿Õ¿“¿
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿Õ»
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿Õ»“≈
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿Õ»ﬂ
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿Õ»ﬂ“
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿ÕŒ
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿ÕŒ“Œ
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿’
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿’¿
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿’Ã≈
    ∆ ¿      >      -∆¿,«¿’“≈
